Montana, session 2025, SB185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Article IV, section 2, of The Constitution of the State of Montana is amended to read:
"Section 2. Qualified elector. Any Only a citizen of the United States 18 years of age or older who
meets the registration and residence requirements provided by law is a qualified elector unless he is serving a
sentence for a felony in a penal institution or is of unsound mind, as determined by a court."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Two-thirds vote required. Because [section 1] is a legislative proposal
to amend the constitution, Article XIV, section 8, of the Montana constitution requires an affirmative roll call vote
of two-thirds of all the members of the legislature, whether one or more bodies, for passage.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on approval by the electorate.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
[this act] and the following:
☐ YES on Constitutional Amendment ____.
☐ NO on Constitutional Amendment ____.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 185